Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1871.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin ROBOTICS PROGRAM GRANTS; APPROPRIATIONS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Grant program established. new text end new text begin The commissioner of education must establish a program to provide competitive grants to schools that support high school robotics teams. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Eligibility; application. new text end new text begin A school district or charter school is eligible to apply for a grant under this section in the form and manner determined by the commissioner. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Allowable uses. new text end new text begin Grant money may be used for: new text end new text begin (1) operational costs for school robotics programs, including new and existing programs; new text end new text begin (2) stipends for robotics program coaches; and new text end new text begin (3) robotics competition event registrations, materials, travel costs, and other expenses associated with preparation for and attendance at robotics events and competitions. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Administration. new text end new text begin The commissioner shall award grants to qualified applicants. Each grant application must include a program budget and planned allowable uses of grant money submitted as part of the grant application. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Report required. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of education must submit a written report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over kindergarten through grade 12 education. The report must identify the grant recipients under this section and summarize the planned grant-funded activities of the grant recipients. new text end new text begin (b) Each grant recipient must submit a report to the commissioner detailing the outcomes of the grant-funded activities, including a description of how the robotics program enhances the college and career readiness of participants. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Appropriations. new text end new text begin The sums indicated are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of education for the fiscal years designated for grants to support competitive robotics programs. new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin ....... new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin ....... new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2027 new text end